Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.422

Rate changes, licenses.

(1) Unless otherwise provided by law: (a) Applications for rate changes and uncontested applications for licenses may, in the agency's discretion, be conducted as adjudicative proceedings; (b) applications for licenses that are contested by a person having standing to contest under the law and review of denials of applications for licenses or rate changes must be conducted as adjudicative proceedings; and (c) an agency may not revoke, suspend, or modify a license unless the agency gives notice of an opportunity for an appropriate adjudicative proceeding in accordance with this chapter or other statute.

(2) An agency with authority to grant or deny a professional or occupational license must notify an applicant for a new or renewal license not later than twenty days prior to the date of the examination required for that license of any grounds for denial of the license which are based on specific information disclosed in the application submitted to the agency. The agency must notify the applicant either that the license is denied or that the decision to grant or deny the license will be made at a future date. If the agency fails to give the notification prior to the examination and the applicant is denied licensure, the examination fee must be refunded to the applicant. If the applicant takes the examination, the agency must notify the applicant of the result.

(3) When a licensee has made timely and sufficient application for the renewal of a license or a new license with reference to any activity of a continuing nature, an existing full, temporary, or provisional license does not expire until the application has been finally determined by the agency, and, in case the application is denied or the terms of the new license limited, until the last day for seeking review of the agency order or a later date fixed by order of the reviewing court.

(4) If the agency finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively requires emergency action, and incorporates a finding to that effect in its order, summary suspension of a license may be ordered pending proceedings for revocation or other action. These proceedings must be promptly instituted and determined.

(5) This section does not apply to requests made by the department of revenue, under the authority of RCW 82.08.155, to the *liquor control board to suspend a person's spirits license and to refuse to renew any spirits license held by the person and to issue any new spirits license to the person.

[ 2012 c 39 s 6; 1989 c 175 s 13; 1988 c 288 s 405; 1980 c 33 s 1; 1967 c 237 s 8. Formerly RCW 34.04.170.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "state liquor control board" was renamed the "state liquor and cannabis board" by 2015 c 70 s 3.

Construction—Effective date—2012 c 39: See notes following RCW 82.08.155.

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.